Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.336

Amendments to application.

A registered foreign limited liability company must amend its foreign registration statement under the circumstances provided in RCW 23.95.515.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7120; 2015 c 188 s 66.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.